District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.08

Report.

The Department shall report to the committee of the Council having jurisdiction over health and human services matters on or before January 1, 2005 and on or before July 1, 2005 on the assessment of fees on manufacturers and labelers of prescription drugs.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 308, 51 DCR 3688